Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-1011.01
Sale of trust property; proceeds of sale; disposition; objecting party; attorney's fees and costs.

If a court enters a judgment in favor of the holder of a trust deed, mortgage, or other lien in any interpleader action, action for declaratory judgment, or any other similar action resulting from an objection to or the uncertainty of the proposed payment of proceeds of the trustee's sale by the trustee to such holders of trust deeds, mortgages, or other liens, the court shall order the objecting party or parties who, without a good-faith reason, objected to the proposed payment of proceeds of the trustee's sale by the trustee, to pay the reasonable attorney's fees and court costs of any such holder.

Laws 2021, LB503, § 1.